Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB117.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 79-201r is hereby amended to read as follows:
79-201r. For all taxable years commencing after December 31, 1991,
the Strother field airport commission and the political subdivisions
comprising the Strother field airport commission shall be exempt from
the payment of ad valorem taxes levied by the state and any other
political or taxing subdivision of the state on property owned by it prior
to and on January 1, 1992 the Strother field airport commission or the
political subdivisions comprising the Strother field airport commission
and depicted on the airport's federally approved airport layout plan
whether used for aviation-related purposes, to promote aviation
commerce or to provide revenue to operate all Strother field
components and activities. Such property shall be, and is hereby,
exempt from all property or ad valorem taxes levied under the laws of
the state of Kansas. All property taxes, including any penalties and
interest accrued thereon, imposed upon any property herein described
for all taxable years commencing prior to January 1, 1992, are hereby
declared to be cancelled but any such amounts paid in any such year
shall not be refunded.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 79-201r is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.